Nebraska, session 109, LB706.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB706 LB706
2025 2025
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 6 of this act:
(1) APS social worker means a social worker:
(a) Who has been trained in crisis intervention, trauma-informed
care, bias reduction, and cultural sensitivity; and
(b) Who has been approved by the department as provided in section 2
of this act;
(2) Commission means the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice;
(3) Crisis intervention means techniques and methods used to assist
individuals who are experiencing acute distress, aiming to reduce the
intensity of the situation and prevent harm;
(4) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(5) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(6) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(7) Social worker means a certified social worker, a certified
master social worker, or a licensed mental health practitioner
credentialed pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act; and
(8) Trauma-informed care means care provided under a framework that
involves understanding, recognizing, and responding to the effects of
trauma with an emphasis on physical, psychological, and emotional safety,
and that provides effective mental health services by taking into account
an individual's past experiences with trauma.
Sec. 2. The department shall develop and implement a program to
approve social workers as APS social workers who are trained in crisis
intervention, trauma-informed care, bias reduction, and cultural
sensitivity. The department may develop its own training program and may
approve training programs from other providers. To retain approval as an
APS social worker, a social worker shall receive annual continuing
education as determined by the department. The department may adopt and
-2-

LB706 LB706
2025 2025
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 3. (1) Each law enforcement agency shall require its dispatch
personnel to screen calls using a checklist or questionnaire designed to
identify calls involving an individual with a history of mental illness
or with mental health concerns. This should include obtaining information
regarding at least the following regarding any individual involved in the
call:
(a) Whether the individual has threatened self-harm or to harm
others;
(b) Indications of disorientation, hallucinations, or paranoia; and
(c) Whether the caller is aware of any history of mental illness of
such individual.
(2) Each law enforcement agency shall flag a call involving an
individual with a history of mental illness or with mental health
concerns as a "Mental Health Priority" and use a designated code to refer
to such calls. Upon identifying a call as a Mental Health Priority, the
dispatcher shall notify the nearest unit that can be accompanied by an
APS social worker and notify such social worker. The dispatcher shall
share any information relating to mental health issues with all
responders to the call.
Sec. 4. Unless it would not be safe or reasonably practicable under
the circumstances, whenever a law enforcement officer is responding to a
call involving an individual with a history of mental illness or mental
health concerns:
(1) The law enforcement officer shall be accompanied by an APS
social worker; and
(2) The APS social worker shall take the lead in the interaction
with such individual and use de-escalation measures and trauma-informed
care that will reduce the potential for violence or harm.
Sec. 5. (1) Each law enforcement agency in this state shall adopt
and provide a copy to the commission of a written policy on the
-3-

LB706 LB706
2025 2025
dispatching of APS social workers with law enforcement officers as
provided in sections 3 and 4 of this act. The commission shall establish
minimum standards for such policies.
(2) The commission may develop and distribute a suggested model
written policy for use by law enforcement agencies, but the commission
shall not mandate the adoption of the model policy except for any
particular law enforcement agency which fails to timely create and
provide to the commission a policy for the agency in conformance with the
commission's minimum standards.
(3) The commission shall, within the limits of its existing
appropriations, including any grant funds which the commission is awarded
for such purpose, provide for an annual review and analysis of law
enforcement agencies' compliance with sections 3 and 4 of this act. The
commission may make recommendations to any law enforcement agency for the
purpose of improving such compliance. The commission shall annually
report the results of such review and analysis and any recommendations to
the Governor and the Legislature. The report submitted to the Legislature
shall be submitted electronically.
Sec. 6. If the commission determines that a law enforcement agency
has a pattern or practice of failing to comply with sections 3 or 4 of
this act or has failed to comply with section 5 of this act, such agency
shall be ineligible to receive loans, grants, funds, or donations
administered by the commission until the commission determines that such
failure has been corrected.
Sec. 7. Section 81-1403, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-1403 Subject to review and approval by the commission, the
council shall:
(1) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for law enforcement
pre-certification, certification, continuing education, and training
requirements. Such rules and regulations may include the authority to
-4-

LB706 LB706
2025 2025
impose a fine on any individual, political subdivision, or agency who or
which violates sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19 or any rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder. The fine for each
separate violation of such sections or of any such rule or regulation
shall not exceed either (a) a one-time maximum fine of five hundred
dollars or (b) a maximum fine of one hundred dollars per day until the
individual, political subdivision, or agency complies with such rules or
regulations;
(2) Adopt and promulgate rules and regulations for the operation of
the training center;
(3) Recommend to the executive director of the commission the names
of persons to be appointed to the position of director of the training
center;
(4) Establish requirements for satisfactory completion of pre-
certification programs, certification programs, and advanced training
programs;
(5) Issue certificates or diplomas attesting satisfactory completion
of pre-certification programs, certification programs, and advanced
training programs;
(6) Revoke or suspend such certificates or diplomas according to
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the council pursuant to
sections 81-1401 to 81-1414.19 for reasons which shall include, but not
be limited to:
(a) Final conviction of or pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a:
(i) Felony violation of state or federal law;
(ii) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence; or
(iii) Misdemeanor violation of state or federal law, if the
violation has a rational connection with the officer's fitness or
capacity to serve as a law enforcement officer;
(b) Serious misconduct; or
(c) A violation of the officer's oath of office, code of ethics, or
-5-

LB706 LB706
2025 2025
statutory duties; or
(d) Willful failure to comply with section 4 of this act.
(7) The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
that:
(a) Provide for the revocation of a certificate or diploma without a
hearing upon the certificate or diploma holder's final conviction of or
pleading guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or misdemeanor described
in subdivision (6) of this section; and
(b) Include a procedure for hearing appeals of any person who feels
that the revocation or suspension of his or her certificate or diploma
was in error;
(8) Set the tuition and fees for the training center and all
officers of other training academies not employed by that training
academy's agency. The tuition and fees set for the training center
pursuant to this subdivision shall be adjusted annually pursuant to the
training center budget approved by the Legislature. All other tuition and
fees shall be set in order to cover the costs of administering sections
81-1401 to 81-1414.19. All tuition and fees shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Nebraska Law Enforcement Training
Center Cash Fund;
(9) Annually certify any training academies providing a basic course
of law enforcement training which complies with the qualifications and
standards promulgated by the council and offering training that meets or
exceeds training that is offered by the training center. The council
shall set the maximum and minimum applicant enrollment figures for
training academies training non-agency officers;
(10) Extend the programs of the training center throughout the state
on a regional basis;
(11) Establish the qualifications, standards, and continuing
education requirements and provide the training required by section
81-1439; and
-6-

LB706 LB706
2025 2025
(12) Do all things necessary to carry out the purpose of the
training center, except that functional authority for budget and
personnel matters shall remain with the commission.
Any administrative fine imposed under this section shall constitute
a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected by lien
foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action by the
office of the Attorney General in the name of the State of Nebraska in
the district court of the county where the final agency action was taken.
All fines imposed by the council shall be remitted to the State Treasurer
for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the
Constitution of Nebraska.
Sec. 8. Original section 81-1403, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-7-